Maryland, session 2025, SB0907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–212.
(a) The target per pupil foundation amount includes costs associated with
implementing the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future including:
(1) Increasing salaries;
(2) Additional teachers to provide professional learning and collaborative
time for teachers;
(3) Career counseling;
(4) Behavioral health;
(5) Instructional opportunities for students who are college and career
ready and those who are not;
(6) Maintenance and operation of schools;
(7) Supplies and materials for teachers; and
(8) Educational technology including digital devices, broadband
connectivity, [and] information technology staff, AND CYBERSECURITY.
(b) Schools may use funds provided under this section to provide the programs
required under COMAR 13A.04.16.01.
(c) (1) [County boards of education and schools shall prioritize the purchase

SENATE BILL 907 3
of digital devices for using funds under subsection (a)(8) of this section.
(2)] Additional funds provided in the target per pupil foundation amount for
educational technology are intended to supplement and not supplant existing funding
provided for educational technology.
[(3)] (2) (i) On or before [November 15 each year] AUGUST 15, 2025,
AND EACH AUGUST 15 THEREAFTER, each county board shall submit a report to the
Department detailing, for the previous fiscal year:
1. The amount spent by the local school system on
[technology disaggregated by digital devices, connectivity, and] information technology
staff[; and] DISAGGREGATED BY:
A. FULL–TIME EMPLOYEES;
B. VENDOR–SUPPORTED STAFF OR CONTRACTORS; AND
C. DEDICATED CYBERSECURITY PROFESSIONALS BY
TYPE, INCLUDING CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICERS AND CYBERSECURITY
SPECIALISTS;
2. The percentage of students, teachers, and staff with
digital devices and adequate connectivity in their homes in accordance with the Federal
Communications Commission standards for broadband; AND
3. CYBERSECURITY EXPENDITURES RELATED TO THE
STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY.
(ii) On or before December 15 each year, the Department shall
submit to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, a compilation of the reports submitted to the Department under subparagraph (i)
of this paragraph.
(iii) On or before September 1, 2021, the Department shall establish
uniform reporting requirements, including definitions to ensure that consistent and
comparable reports are submitted under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
5–213.
(E) (1) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL PROVIDE SUFFICIENT
CYBERSECURITY STAFFING AS DETERMINED BY THE STATE CHIEF INFORMATION
SECURITY OFFICER.

SENATE BILL 907
(2) LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS MAY SHARE SERVICES, CONTRACTORS,
OR REGIONAL SUPPORT FROM THE DEPARTMENT TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, PROVIDED THAT EACH LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM ENSURES TIMELY AND ADEQUATE SUPPORT FOR CYBERSECURITY.
(F) (1) BEGINNING IN 2026, EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL:
(I) COMPLY WITH THE STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY
STANDARDS; AND
(II) CONDUCT A CYBERSECURITY MATURITY ASSESSMENT
EVERY 2 YEARS.
(2) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2026, AND EACH JUNE 30 EVERY 2
YEARS THEREAFTER, EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL CERTIFY TO THE OFFICE
OF SECURITY MANAGEMENT WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY COMPLIANCE WITH THE STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY
STANDARDS.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Cloud computing” means a service that enables on–demand self–service
network access to a shared pool of configurable computer resources, including data storage,
analytics, commerce, streaming, e–mail, document sharing, and document editing.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Information Technology.
(d) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Information Technology.
(E) “STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS” MEANS THE STATE
MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY.
[(e)] (F) “Telecommunication” means the transmission of information, images,
pictures, voice, or data by radio, video, or other electronic or impulse means.
[(f)] (G) “Unit of State government” means an agency or unit of the Executive
Branch of State government.
3.5–2A–02.

SENATE BILL 907 5
There is an Office of Security Management within the Department.
3.5–2A–04.
(b) The Office shall:
(1) establish standards to categorize all information collected or
maintained by or on behalf of each unit of State government;
(2) establish standards to categorize all information systems maintained
by or on behalf of each unit of State government;
(3) develop guidelines governing the types of information and information
systems to be included in each category;
(4) establish security requirements for information and information
systems in each category;
(5) assess the categorization of information and information systems and
the associated implementation of the security requirements established under item (4) of
this subsection;
(6) if the State Chief Information Security Officer determines that there
are security vulnerabilities or deficiencies in any information systems, determine and direct
or take actions necessary to correct or remediate the vulnerabilities or deficiencies, which
may include requiring the information system to be disconnected;
(7) if the State Chief Information Security Officer determines that there is
a cybersecurity threat caused by an entity connected to the network established under §
3.5–404 of this title that introduces a serious risk to entities connected to the network or to
the State, take or direct actions required to mitigate the threat;
(8) manage security awareness training for all appropriate employees of
units of State government;
(9) assist in the development of data management, data governance, and
data specification standards to promote standardization and reduce risk;
(10) assist in the development of a digital identity standard and
specification applicable to all parties communicating, interacting, or conducting business
with or on behalf of a unit of State government;
(11) develop and maintain information technology security policy,
standards, and guidance documents, consistent with best practices developed by the
National Institute of Standards and Technology;
(12) to the extent practicable, seek, identify, and inform relevant

SENATE BILL 907
stakeholders of any available financial assistance provided by the federal government or
non–State entities to support the work of the Office;
(13) provide technical assistance to localities in mitigating and recovering
from cybersecurity incidents; [and]
(14) ANNUALLY REVIEW AND UPDATE THE STATE MINIMUM
CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS; AND
(15) provide technical services, advice, and guidance to units of local
government to improve cybersecurity preparedness, prevention, response, and recovery
practices.
3.5–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Cybersecurity” means processes or capabilities wherein systems,
communications, and information are protected and defended against damage,
unauthorized use or modification, and exploitation.
3.5–405.
(a) This section does not apply to municipal governments.
(b) In a manner and frequency established in regulations adopted by the
Department, each county government, local school system, and local health department
shall, in consultation with the local emergency manager, create or update a cybersecurity
preparedness and response plan and complete a cybersecurity preparedness assessment.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSIGN AT LEAST THREE INFORMATION
SECURITY OFFICERS TO SUPPORT LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS WITH:
(1) COMPLIANCE WITH THE STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY
STANDARDS;
(2) CONDUCTING CYBERSECURITY MATURITY ASSESSMENTS EVERY 2
YEARS; AND
(3) REMEDIATION EFFORTS.
(D) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2026, AND EACH JUNE 30 EVERY 2 YEARS
THEREAFTER, EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL CERTIFY TO THE OFFICE OF
SECURITY MANAGEMENT COMPLIANCE WITH THE STATE MINIMUM
CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS.

SENATE BILL 907 7
Article – State Government
2–1221.
(a) A fiscal/compliance audit conducted by the Office of Legislative Audits shall
include:
(1) examining financial transactions and records and internal controls;
(2) evaluating compliance with applicable laws and regulations;
(3) examining electronic data processing operations; and
(4) evaluating compliance with applicable laws and regulations relating to
the acquisition of goods and services from Maryland Correctional Enterprises.
(b) A performance audit conducted by the Office of Legislative Audits may
include:
(1) evaluating the efficiency, effectiveness, and economy with which
resources are used;
(2) determining whether desired program results are achieved; and
(3) determining the reliability of performance measures, as defined in §
3–1001(g) of the State Finance and Procurement Article, identified in:
(i) the managing for results agency strategic plan developed under
§ 3–1002(c) of the State Finance and Procurement Article; or
(ii) the StateStat agency strategic plan developed under § 3–1003(d)
of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(c) The purpose of financial statement audits conducted by the Office of
Legislative Audits shall be to express an opinion regarding the fairness of the presentation
of a unit’s financial statements.
(d) (1) The audits referred to in subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section shall
be conducted in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards.
(2) FOR THE AUDITS REFERRED TO IN SUBSECTIONS (A), (B), AND (C)
OF THIS SECTION, THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE AUDITS SHALL BE GUIDED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY’S STATE MINIMUM CYBERSECURITY
STANDARDS.
(e) (1) Upon approval of the Joint Audit and Evaluation Committee, the Office

SENATE BILL 907
of Legislative Audits shall develop and use a rating system that is based on the results of
a fiscal/compliance audit to determine an overall evaluation of a unit’s financial
transactions, records, and internal controls and compliance with applicable laws and
regulations as a means of comparing the various units of State government.
(2) When an evaluation is issued, it shall be provided to the unit and shall
be available to the Joint Audit and Evaluation Committee and the Budget Committees of
the Maryland General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, for the 2025–2026 school
year, the Department of Information Technology shall focus on Standard 6.2 Protect (PR)
Controls of the State minimum cybersecurity standards.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.